Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.240

Confidentiality of consideration to convert—Remedial measures for breach.

A savings bank which is considering converting pursuant to this chapter and its directors, officers, and employees shall keep this consideration in the strictest confidence and shall only discuss the potential conversion as would be consistent with the need to prepare information for filing an application for conversion. Should this confidence be breached the director may require remedial measures including:

(1) A public statement by the savings bank that its board of directors is currently considering converting pursuant to this chapter;

(2) Providing for an eligibility record date which shall be as of such a date prior to the adoption of the plan by the converting savings bank's board of directors as to assure the equitability of the conversion;

(3) Limitation of the subscription rights of any person violating or aiding the violation of this section to an amount deemed appropriate by the director; and

(4) Any other actions the director may deem appropriate and necessary to assure the fairness and equitability of the conversion.

[ 1994 c 92 s 369; 1981 c 85 s 47.]